Missouri, session 2026, SB1154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.1250, to read as
follows:
537.1250. 1. (1) This section shall be known and may
be cited as the "Act Against Abusive Website Access
Litigation".
(2) As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Access violation", any allegation that a public
accommodation fails to comply with the accessibility
requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act
or under state law;
(b) "Public accommodation", the same as defined in 42
U.S.C. Section 2000, et seq. For the purposes of this
section, "public accommodation" includes a website operated
by a resident of this state;
(c) "Resident of this state", any individual residing
in Missouri or any entity that has registered with the
Missouri secretary of state's office under chapter 351.
2. (1) The attorney general, on behalf of a class of
residents of this state under section 507.070 who are

SB 1154 2
subject to litigation that alleges any website access
violation and any resident of this state who is subject to
litigation that alleges any website access violation, may
file a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction
within this state against the party, attorney, or law firm
that initiated such litigation for a determination as to
whether such litigation alleging a website access violation
is abusive litigation.
(2) A civil action alleging a website access claim is
considered abusive only if, based on the totality of the
circumstances, the court finds that the primary purpose of
the action was to obtain a monetary settlement unrelated to
improving accessibility or enforcing accessibility rights.
In making this determination, the court may consider:
(a) Whether the same plaintiff, attorney, or law firm
has filed a high number of substantially similar lawsuits
without meaningful efforts to resolve or improve
accessibility;
(b) Whether the plaintiff provided the defendant with
reasonable notice and an opportunity to correct the alleged
barrier prior to filing suit;
(c) Any history of sanctions or findings of bad faith
against the plaintiff or counsel;
(d) Whether the filing party or lawyer filing the
litigation is a resident of this state or is licensed to
practice law in this state;
(e) The nature of settlement discussions and the
reasonableness of settlement offers and refusals to settle.
The application of such settlement information shall be used
only as provided by this section and shall not otherwise
alter the rules of evidence applicable to such court; and

SB 1154 3
(f) Whether any factors under Missouri supreme court
rule 55.03(c) exist in the litigation and whether sanctions
are appropriate under Missouri supreme court rule 55.03(d).
(3) A defendant who receives written notice of an
alleged website accessibility violation and in good faith
initiates substantial steps to correct it within ninety days
shall have a rebuttable presumption that any subsequent
litigation is not abusive. The presumption may be overcome
by showing that the defendant failed to complete reasonable
corrective measures within ninety days or acted in bad
faith. The trier of fact shall not determine whether such
litigation is abusive litigation until after such ninety-day
period expires or the alleged violation is corrected, as
determined by the court, whichever occurs first.
3. The attorney general may intervene or bring an
action on behalf of Missouri residents or entities that are
the targets of abusive website access litigation as defined
in this section. The attorney general may also issue
guidance or determinations clarifying when litigation
practices are deemed abusive, but such determinations shall
not preclude legitimate accessibility enforcement actions.
4. If the trier of fact determines that an initiator
of an action under subsection 2 of this section is a
defendant in abusive litigation, the court may award
reasonable attorney's fees and costs in bringing the action
under subsection 2 of this section as well as defending
against the abusive litigation to be paid by the party
bringing the abusive litigation. In addition, the court may
award punitive damages or sanctions not to exceed three
times the amount of attorney's fees awarded by the court.
5. At the conclusion of the litigation alleging a
website access violation, the court shall review any

SB 1154 4
determination that such litigation is abusive and any award
of attorney's fees under the Missouri rules of professional
conduct to determine the reasonableness of the award before
issuing a judgment.
6. If the federal Department of Justice issues
standards concerning website accessibility under Title III
of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, the attorney
general shall notify the revisor of statutes that such
standards have been issued. Upon receipt of such
notification by the revisor, the provisions of this section
shall expire.
✓